hu: Tűkövetelmény (gyöngyfűző minta): 10-es gyöngyfűző tű; 11-es gyöngyfűző tű; 12-es gyöngyfűző tű; 13-as gyöngyfűző tű; 15-ös gyöngyfűző tű; Nagy lyukú gyöngyfűző tű; Nincs szükség tűre (csak szövőkeret); Csavart dróttű; Egyéb
bg-BG: Изискване за игла (модел за мъниста): Игла за мъниста №10; Игла за мъниста №11; Игла за мъниста №12; Игла за мъниста №13; Игла за мъниста №15; Игла за мъниста с голямо ухо; Не е необходима игла (само за стан); Игла от усукана тел; Друго
el: Απαιτούμενη βελόνα (σχέδιο με χάντρες): Βελόνα για χάντρες #10; Βελόνα για χάντρες #11; Βελόνα για χάντρες #12; Βελόνα για χάντρες #13; Βελόνα για χάντρες #15; Βελόνα για χάντρες με μεγάλο μάτι; Δεν απαιτείται βελόνα (μόνο αργαλειός); Βελόνα από συνεστραμμένο σύρμα; Άλλο
zh-TW: 針具要求（串珠圖案）: 10 號串珠針; 11 號串珠針; 12 號串珠針; 13 號串珠針; 15 號串珠針; 大眼串珠針; 免用針 (僅限串珠機); 雙股絞線針; 其他
ko: 바늘 필요량 (구슬 장식 패턴): 비딩 바늘 10호; 비딩 바늘 11호; 비딩 바늘 12호; 비딩 바늘 13호; 비딩 바늘 15호; 빅 아이 비딩 바늘; 바늘 불필요(베틀 전용); 트위스트 와이어 바늘; 기타
hr-HR: Potrebna igla (uzorak za izradu perlica): Igla za nizanje perli br. 10; Igla za nizanje perli br. 11; Igla za nizanje perli br. 12; Igla za nizanje perli br. 13; Igla za nizanje perli br. 15; Igla za nizanje perli s velikom ušicom; Igla nije potrebna (samo za tkalački stan); Igla od upletene žice; Ostalo
en: Needle requirement (beading pattern): Beading needle #10; Beading needle #11; Beading needle #12; Beading needle #13; Beading needle #15; Big eye beading needle; No needle required (loom only); Twisted wire needle; Other
pt-PT: Requisitos da agulha (padrão de missangas): Agulha de enfiar missangas n.º 10; Agulha de enfiar missangas n.º 11; Agulha de enfiar missangas n.º 12; Agulha de enfiar missangas n.º 13; Agulha de enfiar missangas n.º 15; Agulha de enfiar missangas de olhal grande; Não é necessária agulha (apenas tear); Agulha de fio retorcido; Outro
sk-SK: Požadované ihly (vzor na korálkovanie): Korálkovacia ihla č. 10; Korálkovacia ihla č. 11; Korálkovacia ihla č. 12; Korálkovacia ihla č. 13; Korálkovacia ihla č. 15; Korálkovacia ihla s veľkým uchom; Nevyžaduje sa ihla (len krosná); Ihla zo skrúteného drôtu; Iné
cs: Potřeba jehly (vzor na korálkování): Korálkovací jehla č. 10; Korálkovací jehla č. 11; Korálkovací jehla č. 12; Korálkovací jehla č. 13; Korálkovací jehla č. 15; Korálkovací jehla s velkým okem; Není potřeba jehla (pouze tkalcovský stav); Kroucená drátěná jehla; Ostatní
de: Nadelanforderung (Perlenmuster): Perlennadel Nr. 10; Perlennadel Nr. 11; Perlennadel Nr. 12; Perlennadel Nr. 13; Perlennadel Nr. 15; Perlennadel mit großem Öhr; Keine Nadel erforderlich (nur Webrahmen); Gedrehte Drahtnadel; Sonstiges
es: Aguja recomendada (patrón de abalorios): Aguja para abalorios n.º 10; Aguja para abalorios n.º 11; Aguja para abalorios n.º 12; Aguja para abalorios n.º 13; Aguja para abalorios n.º 15; Aguja para abalorios de ojo grande; No requiere aguja (solo telar); Aguja de alambre trenzado; Otro
ro-RO: Cerințe privind acul (model de mărgelire): Ac pentru mărgele nr. 10; Ac pentru mărgele nr. 11; Ac pentru mărgele nr. 12; Ac pentru mărgele nr. 13; Ac pentru mărgele nr. 15; Ac pentru mărgele cu ureche mare; Nu necesită ac (doar pentru gherghef); Ac din sârmă răsucită; Altele
pt-BR: Agulha requisito (padrão de miçangas): Agulha para miçangas nº 10; Agulha para miçangas nº 11; Agulha para miçangas nº 12; Agulha para miçangas nº 13; Agulha para miçangas nº 15; Agulha para miçangas de fundo largo; Não precisa de agulha (apenas tear); Agulha de arame torcido; Outro
pl: Wymóg igły (wzór koralikowy): Igła do koralików nr 10; Igła do koralików nr 11; Igła do koralików nr 12; Igła do koralików nr 13; Igła do koralików nr 15; Igła do koralików z dużym okiem; Igła nie jest wymagana (tylko krosno); Igła ze skręconego drutu; Inne
it: Ago richiesto (schema per perline): Ago per perline n. 10; Ago per perline n. 11; Ago per perline n. 12; Ago per perline n. 13; Ago per perline n. 15; Ago per perline con cruna larga; Nessun ago richiesto (solo telaio); Ago in filo metallico ritorto; Altro
sl-SI: Zahteva po iglah (vzorec za usmerjanje s kroglicami): Igla za nizanje perlic št. 10; Igla za nizanje perlic št. 11; Igla za nizanje perlic št. 12; Igla za nizanje perlic št. 13; Igla za nizanje perlic št. 15; Igla za nizanje perlic z velikim ušesom; Igla ni potrebna (samo statve); Igla iz zvite žice; Drugo
vi: Yêu cầu về kim khâu (mẫu đính cườm): Kim xỏ cườm #10; Kim xỏ cườm #11; Kim xỏ cườm #12; Kim xỏ cườm #13; Kim xỏ cườm #15; Kim xỏ cườm lỗ to; Không cần kim (chỉ dành cho khung dệt); Kim dây xoắn; Khác
da: Nålekrav til perlemønster: Perlenål #10; Perlenål #11; Perlenål #12; Perlenål #13; Perlenål #15; Perlenål med stort øje; Nål ikke påkrævet (kun væv); Snoet trådnål; Andet
ru: Требования к игле (схема бисероплетения): Игла для бисера № 10; Игла для бисера № 11; Игла для бисера № 12; Игла для бисера № 13; Игла для бисера № 15; Бисерная игла с широким ушком; Игла не требуется (только станок); Игла из витой проволоки; Другое
nl: Naaldvereiste (kralenpatroon): Kralennaald #10; Kralennaald #11; Kralennaald #12; Kralennaald #13; Kralennaald #15; Kralennaald met groot oog; Geen naald vereist (alleen weefraam); Gedraaide draadnaald; Anders
nb: Nålkrav (perlemønster): Perlenål nr. 10; Perlenål nr. 11; Perlenål nr. 12; Perlenål nr. 13; Perlenål nr. 15; Perlenål med stort øye; Ingen nål kreves (kun vev); Vridd stålnål; Annet
fr: Aiguille requise (modèle de perlage): Aiguille à perles nº 10; Aiguille à perles nº 11; Aiguille à perles nº 12; Aiguille à perles nº 13; Aiguille à perles nº 15; Aiguille à perles à grand chas; Aucune aiguille requise (métier à tisser uniquement); Aiguille en fil torsadé; Autre
sv: Nålbehov (för pärlmönster): Pärlnål nr 10; Pärlnål nr 11; Pärlnål nr 12; Pärlnål nr 13; Pärlnål nr 15; Pärlnål med stort öga; Ingen nål krävs (endast vävstol); Nål av tvinnad tråd; Övrigt
lt-LT: Reikalaujama adata (karoliukų raštui): Karoliukų vėrimo adata #10; Karoliukų vėrimo adata #11; Karoliukų vėrimo adata #12; Karoliukų vėrimo adata #13; Karoliukų vėrimo adata #15; Karoliukų vėrimo adata plačia ąsele; Adata nereikalinga (tik staklėms); Suktos vielos adata; Kita
ja: 針の必要数（ビーズパターン）: ビーズ針 #10; ビーズ針 #11; ビーズ針 #12; ビーズ針 #13; ビーズ針 #15; ビッグアイビーズ針; 針不要 (織機のみ); ツイストワイヤー針; その他
fi: Neulavaatimus (helmikirjontakuvio): Helmityöneula nro 10; Helmityöneula nro 11; Helmityöneula nro 12; Helmityöneula nro 13; Helmityöneula nro 15; Isosilmäinen helmityöneula; Ei vaadi neulaa (vain kudontakehys); Kierretty rautalankaneula; Muu
zh-CN: 所需针型（串珠图案）: 10 号串珠针; 11 号串珠针; 12 号串珠针; 13 号串珠针; 15 号串珠针; 大眼串珠针; 无需针（仅限织布机）; 绞线针; 其他
tr: İğne gereksinimi (boncuk deseni): #10 boncuk iğnesi; #11 boncuk iğnesi; #12 boncuk iğnesi; #13 boncuk iğnesi; #15 boncuk iğnesi; Geniş delikli boncuk iğnesi; İğne gerekmez (yalnızca tezgah); Bükümlü tel iğne; Diğer
th: ปริมาณเข็มที่ต้องการ (สำหรับลายลูกปัด): เข็มร้อยลูกปัดเบอร์10; เข็มร้อยลูกปัดเบอร์11; เข็มร้อยลูกปัดเบอร์12; เข็มร้อยลูกปัดเบอร์13; เข็มร้อยลูกปัดเบอร์15; เข็มร้อยลูกปัดตากว้าง; ไม่ต้องใช้เข็ม(สำหรับกี่ทอเท่านั้น); เข็มลวดตีเกลียว; อื่นๆ